Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. Chlamydia and Gonorrhea.

Sec. 18.15.270.
Testing procedures.

The department shall make available on a statewide basis the best current testing method available to detect gonorrhea and chlamydia.

The department shall use the best current testing method available for diagnosis of gonorrhea and chlamydia.

History.

(§ 2 ch 27 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.15.250

. Renumbered in 1992.